Tennessee, session 114, SB0382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
7-51-2601. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Guaranteed income program":
(A) Means a program under which an individual is issued an
unconditional cash payment on a regular basis to be used for any
purpose by the individual; and
(B) Does not include a program under which an individual is
required to seek reemployment, perform work, or attend work training as
a condition of a cash payment; and
(2) "Local government" means a county, incorporated city or town,
metropolitan government, or an agency or unit thereof, or other political
subdivision of the state.
7-51-2602. Local governments prohibited from implementing guaranteed income
programs.
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a local government shall not adopt
or enforce an ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, requirement, or policy that has the
purpose or effect of making a payment to an individual under a guaranteed income
program.
SB0382
002194
- 1 -

SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002194